Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 11
COMMUNITY CENTERS - MENTALLY RETARDED
AND HANDICAPPED

27-11-101 to 27-11-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 1016, § 46, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 8 of chapter 71 in C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions on community-centered boards that provide services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, see part 1 of article 10.5 of this title 27.